Indiana, session 2026, HB1153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-32-3-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14. A dealer must obtain and retain one (1) of the
following from a potential purchaser:
(1) From an individual, a photocopy or electronic scan of the
individual's driver's license or identification card.
(2) From a business, one (1) of the following:
(A) The business's federal employer identification number.
(B) A photocopy or electronic scan of a driver's license,
identification card, or other government issued
photographic identification card of an owner, officer, or
other individual authorized to act on behalf of the business,
together with the name of the business.
SECTION 2. IC 9-32-7.5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.182-2021,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section does not apply to a vehicle
registered as a recovery vehicle under IC 9-18.1-6.
(b) A transport operator may, instead of registering each motor
vehicle transported or disposable trailer used, make a verified
application upon a form prescribed by the secretary and furnished by
the secretary for a general distinctive registration number for:
(1) all motor vehicles transported by the transport operator and
used and operated for the purposes provided; or
HEA 1153

2
(2) all disposable trailers used and operated for the purpose of
transporting sectionalized buildings.
(c) The application must contain the following:
(1) A brief description of:
(A) each style or type of motor vehicle transported or the type
of disposable trailer used to transport the sectionalized
building, whichever is applicable; and
(B) the manner in which the transport operator intends to use
the plates.
(2) The name and address of the transport operator.
(3) For an application to use a disposable trailer, a statement that
the disposable trailer will be disassembled after a single use.
(4) Any other information the secretary requires.
(d) The secretary may not issue transport operator license plates to
a transport operator that has been convicted of violating this article
until the secretary is satisfied that the transport operator is able to
comply with the requirements of this section.
(e) Beginning July 1, 2026, a transport operator must either:
(1) have an established place of business with a physical
Indiana address; or
(2) if the transport operator does not have an established
place of business in Indiana, provide the secretary with proof
of the transport operator's valid registration from the United
States Department of Transportation authorizing the
transport operator to transport within Indiana;
to make a verified application under this section.
SECTION 3. IC 9-32-16-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) A dealership must be licensed by the secretary
of state under this article to operate in Indiana.
(b) A dealership that violates this subsection commits a Class A
infraction.
HEA 1153

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1153